apertium-mk-bg.bg.dix
    <pardef n="чака__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>х</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хме</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хте</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ха</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>л</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ла</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ло</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ли</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>йки</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>й</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>йте</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>н</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>на</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>но</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ни</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>х</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хме</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ше</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>хте</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ше</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ха</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>л</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ла</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ло</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ли</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>м</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ме</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ш</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>те</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>т</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>щ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ща</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>що</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>щи</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="part"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>не</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subst"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="провира"><i>провира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="умира"><i>умира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="намира"><i>намира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="преваля"><i>преваля</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="написва"><i>написва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="свира"><i>свира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="чака"><i>чака</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="разписва"><i>разписва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="облизва"><i>облизва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="предписва"><i>предписва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="набъхтва"><i>набъхтва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="вписва"><i>вписва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="поваля"><i>поваля</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="забива"><i>забива</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="разбира"><i>разбира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="близва"><i>близва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="плаща"><i>плаща</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="очаква"><i>очаква</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="изчаква"><i>изчаква</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="избира"><i>избира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="преизбира"><i>преизбира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="добива"><i>добива</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="приписва"><i>приписва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="отбожда"><i>отбожда</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="побива"><i>побива</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="сваля"><i>сваля</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="вбива"><i>вбива</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="подбира"><i>подбира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="развонява"><i>развонява</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="отбира"><i>отбира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="заинтересува"><i>заинтересува</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="сдобива"><i>сдобива</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="пробива"><i>пробива</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="заплаща"><i>заплаща</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="забърсва"><i>забърсва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="проваля"><i>проваля</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="дописва"><i>дописва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="изписва"><i>изписва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="избива"><i>избива</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="завонява"><i>завонява</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="преписва"><i>преписва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="забожда"><i>забожда</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="пребива"><i>пребива</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="приподписва"><i>приподписва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="сбира"><i>сбира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="разваля"><i>разваля</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="подписва"><i>подписва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="събира"><i>събира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="завира"><i>завира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="дочаква"><i>дочаква</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="причаква"><i>причаква</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="добира"><i>добира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="изплаща"><i>изплаща</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="убива"><i>убива</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="надписва"><i>надписва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="охладява"><i>охладява</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="гледа"><i>гледа</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="набива"><i>набива</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="сбива"><i>сбива</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="убожда"><i>убожда</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="увонява"><i>увонява</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="прибира"><i>прибира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="подбива"><i>подбива</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="набира"><i>набира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="разхладява"><i>разхладява</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="презаписва"><i>презаписва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="обира"><i>обира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="набожда"><i>набожда</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="заваля"><i>заваля</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="придобива"><i>придобива</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="избърсва"><i>избърсва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="отписва"><i>отписва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="обърсва"><i>обърсва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="разбива"><i>разбива</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="избожда"><i>избожда</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="отплаща"><i>отплаща</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="предплаща"><i>предплаща</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="пробира"><i>пробира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="пробожда"><i>пробожда</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="списва"><i>списва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="надплаща"><i>надплаща</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="позаинтересува"><i>позаинтересува</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="навира"><i>навира</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="изблизва"><i>изблизва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="записва"><i>записва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="отбива"><i>отбива</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="описва"><i>описва</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="прохладява"><i>прохладява</i><par n="чака__vblex"/></e>
